Massachusetts, session 194th, H3199.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 64 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2004 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following subsection: -
(ww) Sales of energy star products and hybrid/electric motor vehicles on Earth Day.
of 1